Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.95.900.
Confidentiality of communication.

A licensed social worker, and the social worker’s employees or other persons who have access to the social worker’s records, may not reveal to another person a communication made to the licensee by a client about a matter concerning which the client has employed the licensee in a professional capacity. This section does not apply to

a case conference with other licensed social workers or with other licensed practitioners of the healing arts;

the release of information which the client in writing authorized the licensee to reveal;

information released to the board as part of a disciplinary or other proceeding by the board;

information revealed as part of the discovery of evidence related to a court proceeding or introduced in evidence in a court proceeding;

communications relevant to the physical, mental, or emotional condition of the client in a proceeding in which the condition of the client is an element of the claim or defense of the client, of a party claiming through or under the client, or of a person raising the client’s condition as an element of the person’s own case, or of a person claiming as a beneficiary of the client through a contract to which the client is or was a party; or, after the client’s death, in a proceeding in which a party puts the condition of the client in issue;

a communication to a potential victim or to law enforcement officers where a threat of imminent serious physical harm to an identified victim has been made by a client; or

a communication that indicates that another licensed practitioner of the healing arts has committed an act of unprofessional or unlawful conduct in the provision of health or mental health services if the communication is disclosed by the social worker only to the licensing board with jurisdiction over the type of person who allegedly committed the unprofessional or unlawful conduct and the disclosure is made in good faith.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a licensed social worker shall report incidents of child abuse or neglect as required by AS

47.17.020

and incidents of harm to vulnerable adults as required by AS

47.24.010

.

Information obtained by the board under (a)(3) and (7) of this section is confidential and is not a public record for the purposes of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988; am §§ 16, 17 ch 118 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Sec. 08.95.905.
Immunity relating to certain reports.

A person licensed under this chapter who, in good faith and without malice, discloses to the appropriate licensing board that another licensed practitioner of the healing arts has allegedly committed an act of unprofessional or unlawful conduct in the provision of health or mental health services is immune from civil liability arising out of the disclosure.

History.

(§ 18 ch 118 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.95.910.
Exemptions. [Repealed, § 27 ch 118 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 08.95.911.
Exemption.

Notwithstanding AS

08.95.100(b)(1)

, a person who, on June 30, 2001, was employed or providing services under the title “social worker” may, without obtaining a license under this chapter, continue to use the title “social worker” while the person is employed by the same employer or, if self-employed, while providing the same scope of services, as on June 30, 2001.

The exemption under (a) of this section does not authorize use of the title “social worker” outside the context of the person’s employment or self-employment, as applicable.

For purposes of this section, a person who is employed by

the federal government is not considered to have changed employers if the person begins employment with a different agency of the federal government;

the state is not considered to have changed employers if the person begins employment with a different agency of the state;

a municipality is not considered to have changed employers if the person begins employment with a different agency of the municipality.

History.

(§ 19 ch 118 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 2000)

Sec. 08.95.920.
Unified occupation. [Repealed, § 9 ch 36 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 08.95.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the Board of Social Work Examiners;

“clinical social work” means the diagnosis of psychiatric disorders and the use of techniques of applied psychotherapy of a nonmedical nature while practicing social work;

“clinical social worker” means a person who practices clinical social work;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“practitioner of the healing arts” has the meaning given in AS

47.17.290

;

“social work” means a service in which a special knowledge of social resources, human capabilities, and the part that unconscious motivation plays in determining behavior is directed, through the application of social work principles and methods, at helping individuals to achieve more adequate, satisfying, and productive social adjustments;

“social work principles and methods” include counseling of a nonmedical nature to assist in the treatment of mental and emotional conditions of individuals, families, and groups; providing information and referral services; providing or arranging for the provision of social services; explaining and interpreting the psychosocial aspects in the situations of individuals, families, or groups; helping communities to organize, provide, or improve social and health services; and doing research related to social work.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988; am §§ 20 — 23 ch 118 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (2) and (5) were enacted as (6) and (7), respectively. Renumbered in 1998, at which time former paragraph (2) was renumbered as (6) and former paragraph (5) was renumbered as (7).

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.